Utah statutes.
48-1d-804.   Statement of dissociation.

(1)  A person dissociated as a partner or the partnership may file a statement of dissociation stating the name of the partnership and that the partner is dissociated from the partnership.

(2)  A statement of dissociation is a limitation on the authority of a person dissociated as a partner for the purposes of Subsections 48-1d-303(4) and (5).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

